Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2824
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Transportation Innovation Act. A political subdivision may adopt a resolution or an ordinance establishing rules to carry out the act.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 24;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 72.
July 18, 2026